Utah statutes.
34A-6-110.   Requirements of other laws not limited or repealed -- Worker's
compensation or rights under other laws with respect to employment injuries
not affected.
(1)  Nothing in this chapter is deemed to limit or repeal requirements imposed
by statute or otherwise recognized by law.
(2)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or held to supersede or in any
manner affect workers' compensation or enlarge or diminish or affect the
common-law or statutory rights, duties, or liabilities of employers and
employees under any law with respect to injuries, occupational or other
diseases, or death of employees arising out of, or in the course of
employment.
